Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201852-2105
Notice of lien; contents.

The notice of
lien shall state the name of the commercial real estate broker, the name as
reflected in the commercial real estate broker's records of any person the
commercial real estate broker believes to be an owner of the commercial real
estate on which the lien is claimed, the name as reflected in the commercial
real estate broker's records of any person whom the commercial real estate
broker believes to be obligated to pay the commission under the commission
agreement, a description legally sufficient for identification of the commercial
real estate upon which the lien is claimed, and the amount for which the lien
is claimed. The notice of lien shall recite that the information contained
in the notice is true and accurate to the knowledge of the signatories. The
notice of lien shall be signed by the commercial real estate broker or by
a person authorized to sign on behalf of the commercial real estate broker
and shall be notarized.

Laws 2013, LB3, § 11.